Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-605.5] Mammograms; referral
not required. (a) For purposes of the annual screening mammogram coverage
required under section 432:1-605, no mutual benefit society shall require a
covered person forty years of age and older to obtain a referral from a primary
care provider or other physician for an annual screening mammogram.

(b) If the screening mammogram indicates that
follow up services are advisable, a referral shall be made to the patient's
primary care physician or other physician, as designated by the patient. [L
2012, c 92, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next